Utah statutes.
32A-6-102 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Application and renewal requirements.
(1)  A person seeking a special use permit of any kind under this chapter
shall file a written application with the department in a form prescribed by
the department. The application shall be accompanied by:
(a)  a nonrefundable application fee if required by any section of this
chapter;
(b)  an initial permit fee if required by any section of this chapter, which
is refundable if a permit is not granted;
(c) a one-time special use permit fee if required by any section of this
chapter, which is refundable if a permit is not granted;
(d)  a statement of the purpose for which the applicant has applied for the
special permit;
(e)  written consent of the local authority;
(f)  a bond, where required by any section of this chapter;
(g)  where required by any section of this chapter, a floor plan of the
immediate area within the premises in which the applicant proposes that
alcoholic products are stored, used, mixed, sold, or consumed;
(h)  a signed consent form stating that the permittee will permit any
authorized representative of the commission, department, or any other law
enforcement officer unrestricted right to enter the permittee's premises;
(i)  in the case of an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or
limited liability company, proper verification evidencing that the person or
persons signing the special use permit application are authorized to so act on
the behalf of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company;
(j)  a description of the types of alcoholic product the applicant intends to
use under authority of the special use permit; and
(k)  any other information the commission or department may require by rule or
policy to allow complete evaluation of the application.
(2) (a)  All special use permits expire on December 31 of each year unless
otherwise provided on the permit.
(b)  Persons desiring to renew a renewable special use permit shall submit a
completed renewal application to the department no later than November 30.
(c)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements shall result in an automatic
forfeiture of the license, effective on the date the existing permit expires.
(d)  Renewal applications shall be in a form prescribed by the department.
(3)  To ensure compliance with Subsection 32A-6-105(8), the commission may
suspend or revoke a special use permit if any special use permittee does not
immediately notify the department of any change in:
(a)  ownership of the permittee's business;
(b)  for a corporate owner, the:
(i)  corporate officers or directors; or
(ii)  shareholders holding at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding
stock of the corporation; or
(c)  for a limited liability company:
(i)  managers; or
(ii)  members owning at least 20% of the limited liability company.
